Hawaii statutes.
§371-12 Labor law enforcement; injunction.
The department of labor and industrial relations shall:

(1) Enforce the child labor provisions of this
chapter;

(2) Enforce this chapter relative to the regulation
of commercial employment agencies;

(3) Enforce any other labor laws enacted by the
legislature of the State;

(4) Enforce the provisions of section 394B-9
regarding dislocated workers;

(5) Enforce any rules or regulations of the
department. The department may institute proceedings to enjoin any employer
from violating this chapter or the rules or regulations of the department when
any such employer is violating any such provision or is threatening to do so
and the circuit courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction in the premises;

(6) Conduct investigations in connection with the
foregoing; and

(7) Perform such additional duties as the director of
labor and industrial relations shall by rule prescribe. [L 1939, c 237, §1(15);
RL 1945, §4118; RL 1955, §88-19; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §371-12; am L
1973, c 31, pt of §21; am L 2011, c 137, §1]

Cross References

Child labor, see chapter 390.

Commercial employment agencies, see chapter 373.

Injunctions, see §603-23.

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next